Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1353
Act; how construed.

(1) The provisions
of the Public Protection Act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its
remedial purposes.

(2) Nothing
in the act shall supersede any provision of federal, state, or other law imposing
criminal penalties or affording civil remedies in addition to those provided
for in the act.

Laws 2009, LB155, § 3.